Oklahoma, session 2025, SB589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 384, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 11-103.6), is amended to read as follows:


Section 11-103.6. A. 1. The State Board of Education shall


adopt subject matter standards for instruction of students in the


public schools of this state that are necessary to ensure there is


attainment of desired levels of competencies in a variety of areas


to include language, mathematics, science, social studies,


communication, and health and physical education.



Req. No. 1104 Page 1


2. School districts shall develop and implement curriculum,


courses, and instruction in order to ensure that students meet the


skills and competencies as set forth in this section and in the


subject matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education.


3. All students shall gain literacy at the elementary and


secondary levels. Students shall develop skills in reading,


writing, speaking, computing, and critical thinking. For purposes


of this section, critical thinking “critical thinking” means a


manner of analytical thinking which is logical and uses linear


factual analysis to reach a conclusion. They shall learn about


cultures and environments - their own and those of others with whom


they share the earth. All students shall receive the instruction


needed to lead healthy and physically active lifestyles. Students,


therefore, shall study social studies, literature, languages, the


arts, health, mathematics, and science. Such curricula shall


provide for the teaching of a hands-on career exploration program in


cooperation with technology center schools.


4. The subject matter standards shall be designed to teach the


competencies for which students shall be tested as provided in


Section 1210.508 of this title and shall be designed to prepare all


students for active citizenship, employment, and/or successful


completion of postsecondary education without the need for remedial


coursework at the postsecondary level.



Req. No. 1104 Page 2


5. The subject matter standards shall be designed with rigor as


defined in paragraph 6 of subsection F of this section.


6. The subject matter standards for English Language Arts shall


give Classic Literature and nonfiction literature equal


consideration to other literature. In addition, emphasis shall be


given to the study of complete works of literature.


7. At a minimum, the subject matter standards for mathematics


shall require mastery of the standard algorithms in mathematics,


which is the most logical, efficient way of solving a problem that


consistently works, and for students to attain fluency in Euclidian


Euclidean geometry.


8. The subject matter standards for history, social studies,


and United States Government shall include the content of the United


States naturalization test, with an emphasis on the specific content


of the test and the ideas and concepts it references. The United


States naturalization test shall be made available in physical and


electronic online formats as an optional assessment tool for


teachers.


9. The subject matter standards for United States Government


shall include an emphasis on civics. For the purposes of this


section, “civics” means the study of the rights and duties of


Oklahoma and United States citizens and of how those governments


work.



Req. No. 1104 Page 3


10. The subject matter standards for health and physical


education shall include, but not be limited to, the domains of


physical, emotional, social, and intellectual health. Health


literacy shall include the ability to obtain, process, and


understand basic health information and services needed to make


appropriate health decisions. Health shall also include the


importance of proper nutrition and exercise, mental health and


wellness, substance abuse, coping skills for understanding and


managing trauma, establishing and maintaining positive


relationships, and responsible decision making. Physical literacy


shall include the ability to move with competence and confidence in


a wide variety of physical activities in multiple environments that


benefit the healthy development of the whole person.


B. Subject to the provisions of subsection C or subsection D of


this section, in order to graduate from a public high school


accredited by the State Board of Education with a standard diploma,


students enrolled in grades eight through twelve in the 2024-2025


school year shall complete the following college preparatory/work


ready curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary


level:


1. Four units or sets of competencies of English to include


Grammar, Composition, Literature, or any English course approved for


college admission requirements;



Req. No. 1104 Page 4


2. Three units or sets of competencies of mathematics, limited


to Algebra I, Algebra II, Geometry, Trigonometry, Math Analysis,


Calculus, Advanced Placement Statistics, or any mathematics course


with content and/or rigor above Algebra I and approved for college


admission requirements;


3. Three units or sets of competencies of laboratory science


approved for college admission requirements including one unit or


set of competencies of life science meeting the standards for


Biology I; one unit or set of competencies of physical science


meeting the standards for Physical Science, Chemistry, or Physics;


and one unit or set of competencies from the domains of physical


science, life science, or earth and space science such that the


content and rigor is above Biology I or Physical Science;


4. Three units or sets of competencies of history and


citizenship skills including one unit of American History, 1/2 unit


of Oklahoma History, 1/2 unit of United States Government, and one


unit from the subjects of History, Government, Geography, Economics,


Civics, or non-Western culture and approved for college admission


requirements;


5. Two units or sets of competencies of the same world or non-


English language or two units of computer technology approved for


college admission requirements, whether taught at a high school or a


technology center school including computer programming, hardware,


and business computer applications, such as word processing,

Req. No. 1104 Page 5


databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding keyboarding or


typing courses;


6. One additional unit or set of competencies selected from


paragraphs 1 through 5 of this subsection or career and technology


education courses, concurrently enrolled courses, advanced placement


courses, or International Baccalaureate courses approved for college


admission requirements; and


7. One unit or set of competencies of fine arts, such as music,


art, or drama, or one unit or set of competencies of speech.


C. In lieu of the requirements of subsection B or subsection D


of this section which requires a college preparatory/work ready


curriculum, a student enrolled in grades eight through twelve in the


2024-2025 school year may enroll in the core curriculum as provided


in this subsection upon written approval of the parent or legal


guardian of the student. For students under the age of eighteen


(18) school districts shall require a parent or legal guardian of


the student to meet with a designee of the school prior to


enrollment in the core curriculum. The State Department of


Education shall develop and distribute to school districts a form


suitable for this purpose, which shall include information on the


benefits to students of completing the college preparatory/work


ready curriculum as provided for in subsection B of this section.


In order to graduate from a public high school accredited by the


State Board of Education with a standard diploma, students enrolled

Req. No. 1104 Page 6


in grades eight through twelve in the 2024-2025 school year shall


complete the following core curriculum units or sets of competencies


at the secondary level:


1. Language Arts – 4 units or sets of competencies to consist


of 1 unit or set of competencies of grammar and composition, and 3


units or sets of competencies which may include, but are not limited


to, the following courses:


a. American Literature,


b. English Literature,


c. World Literature,


d. Advanced English Courses, or


e. other English courses with content and/or rigor equal


to or above grammar and composition;


2. Mathematics – 3 units or sets of competencies to consist of


unit or set of competencies of Algebra I or Algebra I taught in a


contextual methodology, and 2 units or sets of competencies which


may include, but are not limited to, the following courses:


a. Algebra II,


b. Geometry or Geometry taught in a contextual


methodology,


c. Trigonometry,


d. Math Analysis or Precalculus,


e. Calculus,


f. Statistics and/or Probability,

Req. No. 1104 Page 7


g. Computer Science or acceptance and successful


completion of one (1) year of a full-time, three-hour


career and technology program leading to an industry


credential/certificate or college credit. The State


Board of Career and Technology Education shall


promulgate rules to define the provisions of this


section related to the accepted industry-valued


credentials which are industry-endorsed or industry-


aligned. The list of accepted industry-valued


credentials shall be reviewed annually and updated at


least every three (3) years by the Board,


h. (1) contextual mathematics courses which enhance


technology preparation, or


(2) a science, technology, engineering, and math


(STEM) block course meeting the requirements for


course competencies listed in paragraph 2 of


subsection B of this section, whether taught at


a:


(a) comprehensive high school, or


(b) technology center school when taken in the


tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade, taught by


a certified teacher, and approved by the


State Board of Education and the independent


district board of education,

Req. No. 1104 Page 8


i. mathematics courses taught at a technology center


school by a teacher certified in the secondary subject


area when taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth


grade upon approval of the State Board of Education


and the independent district board of education, or


j. any other mathematics course with content and/or rigor


equal to or above Algebra I;


3. Science – 3 units or sets of competencies to consist of 1


unit or set of competencies of Biology I or Biology I taught in a


contextual methodology, and 2 units or sets of competencies in the


areas of life, physical, or earth science or technology which may


include, but are not limited to, the following courses:


a. Chemistry I,


b. Physics,


c. Biology II,


d. Chemistry II,


e. Physical Science,


f. Earth Science,


g. Botany,


h. Zoology,


i. Physiology,


j. Astronomy,


k. Applied Biology/Chemistry,


l. Applied Physics,

Req. No. 1104 Page 9


m. Principles of Technology,


n. qualified agricultural education courses,


o. (1) contextual science courses which enhance


technology preparation, or


(2) a science, technology, engineering, and math


(STEM) block course meeting the requirements for


course competencies listed in paragraph 3 of


subsection B of this section, whether taught at


a:


(a) comprehensive high school, or


(b) technology center school when taken in the


tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade, taught by


a certified teacher, and approved by the


State Board of Education and the independent


district board of education,


p. science courses taught at a technology center school


by a teacher certified in the secondary subject area


when taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade


upon approval of the State Board of Education and the


independent district board of education, or


q. other science courses with content and/or rigor equal


to or above Biology I;


4. Social Studies – 3 units or sets of competencies to consist


of 1 unit or set of competencies of United States History, 1/2 to 1

Req. No. 1104 Page 10


unit or set of competencies of United States Government, 1/2 unit or


set of competencies of Oklahoma History, and 1/2 to 1 unit or set of


competencies which may include, but are not limited to, the


following courses:


a. World History,


b. Geography,


c. Economics,


d. Anthropology, or


e. other social studies courses with content and/or rigor


equal to or above United States History, United States


Government, and Oklahoma History;


5. Arts – 1 unit or set of competencies which may include, but


is not limited to, courses in Visual Arts and General Music; and


6. Computer Education or World Language - 1 unit or set of


competencies of computer technology, whether taught at a high school


or a technology center school including computer programming,


hardware, and business computer applications, such as word


processing, databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding


keyboarding or typing courses, or 1 unit or set of competencies of


world or non-English language.


D. Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, students whose


parent or legal guardian approve modification of the existing


graduation track as outlined in subsections B and C of this section,


subject to school approval, may complete a minimum of twenty-three

Req. No. 1104 Page 11


(23) curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary level


as listed below; and provided for in this subsection. Beginning


with students entering the eighth grade in the 2025-2026 school


year, in order to graduate from a public high school accredited by


the State Board of Education with a standard diploma, students shall


complete a minimum of the following twenty-three (23) curriculum


units or sets of competencies at the secondary level:


1. Four units or sets of competencies of English to include


Grammar, Composition, Literature, or any English course including


English 10: Advanced Placement Seminar;


2. Four units or sets of competencies of mathematics, two of


which shall be Algebra I and either Algebra II or Geometry. The


other two units may include Algebra II, Geometry, Trigonometry, Math


Analysis, Calculus, Statistics, Math of Finance, Computer Science,


college courses approved for dual credit, an approved full-time


postsecondary career and technology program, or locally approved


math based application course, or any mathematics course with


content and/or rigor above Algebra I;


3. Three units or sets of competencies of laboratory science


approved for college admission requirements including one unit or


set of competencies of life science meeting the standards for


Biology I; one unit or set of competencies of physical science


meeting the standards for Physical Science, Chemistry, or Physics;


and one unit or set of competencies from the domains of physical

Req. No. 1104 Page 12


science, life science, or earth and space science, or approved full-


time postsecondary career and technology program or locally approved


science based application course, or any science course with content


and/or rigor above Biology I or Physical Science;


4. Three units or sets of competencies of history and


citizenship skills including one unit of American History, 1/2 unit


of Oklahoma History, 1/2 unit of United States Government, and one


unit from the subjects of History, Government, Geography, Economics,


Civics, or non-Western culture;


5. Six pathway units or sets of competencies approved at the


discretion of the school district board of education which align


with each student’s Individual Career and Academic Plan (ICAP) and


may include, but are not limited to, any additional units or sets of


competencies as provided in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this


subsection, world or non-English language, computer technology,


Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corps (JROTC), internship or


apprenticeship programs, career and technology education courses,


concurrently enrolled courses, advanced placement courses,


International Baccalaureate courses approved for college admission


requirements, music, art, drama, speech, dance, media arts, or other


approved courses; and


6. Three units or sets of competencies of elective courses


approved by the school district board of education.



Req. No. 1104 Page 13


E. A school district shall determine the specific description


of the locally approved math and science based application courses


allowed pursuant to paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection D of this


section. Formal notification with the specific course description


shall be provided to the State Department of Education prior to July


of each school year. The notification shall include what courses


will be coded as locally approved math and science based application


courses for the ensuing school year.


F. 1. In addition to the curriculum requirements of subsection


B, C, or D of this section, in order to graduate from a public high


school accredited by the State Board of Education students shall


complete the requirements for a personal financial literacy passport


as set forth in the Passport to Financial Literacy Act and any


additional course requirements or recommended elective courses as


may be established by the State Board of Education and the district


school board. School districts shall strongly encourage students to


complete two units or sets of competencies of world languages and


two units or sets of competencies of physical and health education.


2. No student shall receive credit for high school graduation


more than once for completion of the same unit or set of


competencies to satisfy the curriculum requirements of this section.


3. A school district shall not be required to offer every


course listed in subsections B, C, and D of this section but shall



Req. No. 1104 Page 14


offer sufficient courses to allow a student to meet the graduation


requirements during the secondary grade years of the student.


G. For purposes of this section:


1. “Contextual methodology” means academic content and skills


taught by utilizing real-world problems and projects in a way that


helps students understand the application of that knowledge;


2. “Locally approved” means approved by the local school


district board of education;


3. “Math based application course” means a course that teaches


math content within a real-world application;


4. “Pathway unit” means a course taken by a high school student


that is aligned with the student’s current Individualized Individual


Career and Academic Plan (ICAP);


5. “Qualified agricultural education courses” means courses


that have been determined by the State Board of Education to offer


the sets of competencies for one or more science content areas and


which correspond to academic science courses. Qualified


agricultural education courses shall include, but are not limited


to, horticulture, plant and soil science, natural resources and


environmental science, and animal science. The courses shall be


taught by teachers certified in agricultural education and comply


with all rules of the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology


Education;



Req. No. 1104 Page 15


6. “Rigor” means a level of difficulty that is thorough,


exhaustive, and accurate and is appropriate for the grade level;


7. “Science based application course” means a course that


teaches science content within a real-world application;


8. “Sets of competencies” means instruction in those skills and


competencies that are specified in the subject matter standards


adopted by the State Board of Education and other skills and


competencies adopted by the Board, without regard to specified


instructional time; and


9. “Unit” means a Carnegie Unit as defined by the North Central


Association’s Commission on Schools.


H. 1. The State Board of Education, State Board of Career and


Technology Education, and Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education shall adopt a joint plan and electronically submit it to


the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives and the


President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate by January 1,


2025, to ensure that rigor is maintained in the content, teaching


methodology, level of expectations for student achievement, and


application of learning in all the courses taught to meet the


graduation requirements specified in subsection D of this section.


2. The State Board of Education shall allow as much flexibility


at the district level as is possible without diminishing the rigor


or undermining the intent of providing these courses. To accomplish


this purpose, the State Department of Education shall work with

Req. No. 1104 Page 16


school districts in reviewing and approving courses taught by


districts that are not specifically listed in subsections B, C, and


D of this section. Options may include, but shall not be limited


to, courses taken by concurrent enrollment, advanced placement, or


correspondence, or courses bearing different titles.


3. Technology center school districts may offer programs


designed in cooperation with institutions of higher education.


Students in the tenth grade may be allowed to attend these programs


for up to one-half (1/2) of a school day and credit for the units or


sets of competencies required in paragraphs 2, 3, and 6 of


subsection B or C and paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection D of this


section shall be given if the courses are taught by a teacher


certified in the secondary subject area; provided, credit for units


or sets of competencies pursuant to subsection B of this section


shall be approved for college admission requirements.


4. If a student enrolls in a concurrent course, the school


district shall not be responsible for any costs incurred for that


course, unless the school district does not offer enough course


selection during the student’s secondary grade years to allow the


student to receive the courses needed to meet the graduation


requirements of this section. If the school district does not offer


the necessary course selection during the student’s secondary grade


years, it shall be responsible for the cost of resident tuition at


an institution in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,

Req. No. 1104 Page 17


fees, and books for the concurrent enrollment course, and providing


for transportation to and from the institution to the school site.


It is the intent of the Legislature that for students enrolled


in a concurrent enrollment course which is paid for by the school


district pursuant to this paragraph, the institution charge only the


supplementary and special service fees that are directly related to


the concurrent enrollment course and enrollment procedures for that


student. It is further the intent of the Legislature that fees for


student activities and student service facilities including the


student health care and cultural and recreational service fees not


be charged to such students.


5. Credit for the units or sets of competencies required in


subsection B, C, or D of this section shall be given when such units


or sets of competencies are taken prior to ninth grade if the


teachers are certified or authorized to teach the subjects for high


school credit and the required rigor is maintained.


6. The units or sets of competencies in mathematics required in


subsection B, C, or D of this section may be completed at any time


during the eighth through twelfth grades. If a student completes


any required courses or sets of competencies in mathematics prior to


eighth grade, the student may take any other mathematics courses or


sets of competencies to fulfill the requirement to complete the


units or sets of competencies in grades eight through twelve after



Req. No. 1104 Page 18


the student has satisfied the requirements of subsection B, C, or D


of this section.


7. All units or sets of competencies required for graduation


may be taken in any sequence recommended by the school district.


I. As a condition of receiving accreditation from the State


Board of Education, all students in grades nine through twelve shall


enroll in a minimum of six periods, or the equivalent in block


scheduling or other scheduling structure that allows for instruction


in sets of competencies, of rigorous academic and/or rigorous


vocational courses each day, which may include arts, vocal and


instrumental music, speech classes, and physical education classes.


J. 1. Academic and vocational-technical courses designed to


offer sets of competencies integrated or embedded within the course


that provide for the teaching and learning of the appropriate skills


and knowledge in the subject matter standards, as adopted by the


State Board of Education, may upon approval of the Board, in


consultation with the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology


Education if the courses are offered at a technology center school


district, be counted for academic credit and toward meeting the


graduation requirements of this section.


2. Internet-based courses offered by a technology center school


that are taught by a certified teacher and provide for the teaching


and learning of the appropriate skills and knowledge in the subject


matter standards may, upon approval of the State Board of Education

Req. No. 1104 Page 19


and the independent district board of education, be counted for


academic credit and toward meeting the graduation requirements of


this section.


3. Internet-based courses or vocational-technical courses


utilizing integrated or embedded skills for which no subject matter


standards have been adopted by the State Board of Education may be


approved by the Board, in consultation with the Oklahoma Department


of Career and Technology Education if the courses are offered by a


technology center school district, if such courses incorporate


standards of nationally recognized professional organizations and


are taught by certified teachers.


4. Courses offered by a supplemental education organization


that is accredited by a national accrediting body and that are


taught by a certified teacher and provide for the teaching and


learning of the appropriate skills and knowledge in the subject


matter standards may, upon approval of the State Board of Education


and the school district board of education, be counted for academic


credit and toward meeting the graduation requirements of this


section.


K. The State Board of Education shall provide an option for


high school graduation based upon attainment of the desired levels


of competencies as required in tests pursuant to the provisions of


Section 1210.508 of this title. Such option shall be in lieu of the


amount of course credits earned.

Req. No. 1104 Page 20


L. The State Board of Education shall prescribe, adopt, and


approve a promotion system based on the attainment by students of


specified levels of competencies in each area of the core


curriculum.


M. Children who have individualized education programs pursuant


to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), and who


satisfy the graduation requirements through the individualized


education program for that student shall be awarded a standard


diploma.


N. Any student who completes the curriculum requirements of the


International Baccalaureate Diploma Program shall be awarded a


standard diploma.


O. Any student who successfully completes an advanced


mathematics or science course offered pursuant to Section 1210.404


of this title shall be granted academic credit toward meeting the


graduation requirements pursuant to paragraph 2 or 3, as


appropriate, of subsection B, C, or D of this section.


P. For purposes of this section, the courses approved for


college admission requirements shall be courses which are approved


by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for admission to


an institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.


Q. Students who have been denied a standard diploma by the


school district in which the student is or was enrolled for failing


to meet the requirements of this section may re-enroll in the school

Req. No. 1104 Page 21


district that denied the student a standard diploma following the


denial of a standard diploma. The student shall be provided


remediation or intervention and the opportunity to complete the


curriculum units or sets of competencies required by this section to


obtain a standard diploma. Students who re-enroll in the school


district to meet the graduation requirements of this section shall


be exempt from the hourly instructional requirements of Section 1-


111 of this title and the six-period enrollment requirements of this


section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1104 EB 1/19/2025 5:39:19 AM

















Req. No. 1104 Page 22